North Carolina, session 2025, SB47.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143B-426.40A reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-426.40A. Assignments of claims against State.
…
(g) Payroll Deduction for Payments to Certain Employees' Associations Allowed. – An
employee of the State or any of its political subdivisions, institutions, departments, bureaus,
agencies or commissions, or any of its local boards of education or community colleges, who is
a member of a domiciled employees' association that has at least 2,000 members, 500 of whom
are employees of the State, a political subdivision of the State, or public school employees, may
authorize, in writing, the periodic deduction each payroll period from the employee's salary or
wages a designated lump sum to be paid to the employees' association. A political subdivision
may also allow periodic deductions for a domiciled employees' association that does not
otherwise meet the minimum membership requirements set forth in this paragraph. The total
membership count and the State, political subdivision of the State, or public school employee
membership count of a domiciled employees' association that has at least 2,000 members, 500 of
whom are employees of the State, a political subdivision of the State, or public school employees,
shall be verified and certified annually by the State Auditor.
An employee of any local board of education who is a member of a domiciled employees'
association that has at least 40,000 members, the majority of whom are public school teachers,
may authorize in writing the periodic deduction each payroll period from the employee's salary
or wages a designated lump sum or sums to be paid for dues and voluntary contributions for the
employees' association. The total membership count and the public school teacher membership
count of a domiciled employees' association that has at least 40,000 members, the majority of
whom are public school teachers, shall be verified and certified annually by the State Auditor.
An authorization under this subsection shall remain in effect until revoked by the employee.
A plan of payroll deductions pursuant to this subsection for employees of the State and other
association members shall become void if the employees' association engages in collective
bargaining with the State, any political subdivision of the State, or any local school administrative
unit. This subsection does not apply to county or municipal governments or any local
governmental unit, except for local boards of education.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S47-v-1*